North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-20.1 Career and Technical Education

15-20.1-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Career and technical education” includes vocational education.

“Department” means the department of career and technical education, which consists of the director and other persons appointed or designated by the state board or the director to carry out the duties of the state board.

“Director” means the director of career and technical education.

“Regulations” means regulations made by the director with the approval of the state board.

“State board” means the state board for career and technical education.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1971, ch. 171, § 1; 1973, ch. 383, § 13; 1993, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 49, § 4; 2003, ch. 138, § 16.

15-20.1-02.
State board for career and technical education — Director of career and technical education — Appointment, qualifications, assistants, duties.

The state board for career and technical education consists of the members of the state board of public school education, the executive director of job service North Dakota, and the commissioner of higher education or the commissioner’s designee. The state board shall oversee the department and appoint a director and executive officer of career and technical education who are charged with the administration, under the direction and supervision of the board, of the provisions of this chapter relating to career and technical education. The state board shall designate such assistants to the director as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The duties, terms of office, and compensation of the director and of the director’s assistants must be determined by the state board. The director shall hold as a minimum a baccalaureate degree received from a recognized college or university. The director shall enforce such rules and regulations as the state board may adopt and shall prepare such reports concerning career and technical education as the state board may require.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1993, ch. 62, § 4; 1997, ch. 49, § 5; 2003, ch. 138, § 17.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 17 of chapter 138, S.L. 2003 became effective August 1, 2003.

15-20.1-03.
Powers and duties of state board relating to career and technical education.

The state board shall have all authority necessary to cooperate with the United States department of education or other department or agency of the United States of America in the administration of acts of Congress relating to career and technical education, including the following powers and duties:

To administer any legislation enacted by the legislative assembly of this state pursuant to or in conformity with acts of Congress relating to career and technical education.

To administer the funds provided by the federal government and by this state for the promotion of career and technical education and to contract with:

Any public or private institution or agency, board of trustees of any agricultural and training school, or school district of this state; or

Any public or private institution or agency, or political subdivision, of another state.

To formulate plans for the promotion of career and technical education in such subjects as are an essential and integral part of the public school system of education in this state.

To provide for the preparation of teachers.

To fix the compensation of such officers and assistants as may be necessary to administer the federal acts and the provisions of this chapter relating to career and technical education and to pay the same and other necessary expenses of administration from any funds appropriated for such purpose.

To make studies and investigations relating to career and technical education.

To promote and aid in the establishment of schools, departments, or classes, and to cooperate with local communities in the maintenance of career and technical education schools, departments, or classes.

To prescribe the qualifications and provide for the certification of teachers, directors, and supervisors.

To cooperate with governing bodies of school districts and with organizations and communities in the maintenance of classes for the preparation of teachers, directors, and supervisors of career and technical education, to maintain classes for such purposes under its own direction and control, and to establish and control, by general regulations, the qualifications to be possessed by persons engaged in the training of career and technical education teachers.

To coordinate new and existing farm management programs offered by any state agency or entity.

To create and expand marketing clubs as adjuncts to new and existing farm management programs.

To administer and supervise the program and all activities of the center for distance education.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1983, ch. 82, § 22; 1997, ch. 49, § 6; 1999, ch. 163, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 18; 2019, ch. 141, § 7, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Career and technical education certificate qualifications unaffected by general teacher certification requirements, see N.D.C.C. § 15.1-13-10 .

15-20.1-03.1.
Postsecondary career and technical education reciprocity with Minnesota.

The state board may enter into agreements with the Minnesota higher education coordinating board or with the governing board of any public postsecondary career and technical institute in that state to enable, on a reciprocal basis, any resident of North Dakota to attend an approved career and technical education program in Minnesota and to permit any resident of Minnesota to attend an approved career and technical education program in North Dakota without being required to pay nonresident tuition fees. For the purposes of this section, “approved career and technical education program” means any postsecondary career and technical program offered by a Minnesota area career and technical institute or a district-operated junior college in North Dakota. Any agreement made pursuant to this section may provide for the transfer of funds between the states and any payment to Minnesota by North Dakota must be within the limitations of the payment due North Dakota from Minnesota under the authority contained in chapter 15-10.1. Any payment to North Dakota by Minnesota must be deposited in the state’s general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 179, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 19.

15-20.1-04.
Acceptance of benefits of federal acts in career and technical education — Cooperation with federal government.

The state of North Dakota hereby accepts all of the provisions and benefits of the acts of Congress to assist states to maintain, extend, and improve existing programs and develop new programs in career and technical education.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1973, ch. 383, § 14; 2003, ch. 138, § 20.

15-20.1-05.
Custody and payment of career and technical education funds.

The state board is charged with the duty of administering all funds that are received from federal and state sources and shall accept and use gifts made unconditionally by will or otherwise for purposes of carrying out this chapter for career and technical education. All such moneys received must be placed in the custody of the state treasurer and must be paid in accordance with legislative appropriations by the office of management and budget as directed by the director of career and technical education.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1971, ch. 171, § 2; 1973, ch. 383, § 15; 1993, ch. 62, § 5; 2003, ch. 138, § 21.

15-20.1-06.
Reimbursement of schools teaching subjects in career and technical education.

The state board may reimburse approved public or private institutions or agencies, or political subdivisions of this state or of another state, giving instruction in career and technical education from funds allocated for that purpose. The state board may prorate the sums available if funds are insufficient to reimburse at the rate established by the state board.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1983, ch. 201, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 22.

15-20.1-07.
Cooperation of school boards in career and technical education.

The governing body of any school district may cooperate with the state board in the establishment and maintenance of schools, departments, or classes giving instruction in career and technical education as approved by the state board and may use any moneys raised by public taxation for such purposes in the same manner as the moneys for other school purposes are used for the maintenance and support of public schools. When any school, department, or class giving instruction in career and technical education has been approved by the state board, it may be entitled to share in any federal and state funds available for career and technical education.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1983, ch. 201, § 2; 2003, ch. 138, § 23.

15-20.1-08.
Mill levy for vocational education programs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

15-20.1-09.
Board membership — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 62, § 20.

15-20.1-10.
Specific powers — Tuition payments — Bond issues. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 138, § 104.

15-20.1-11.
Curriculum — General powers and duties.

The curriculum offered students by an area career and technology center must be as determined by the school board; provided, that such curriculum must be submitted annually to the state board for approval, and only an approved curriculum may be offered.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 2003, ch. 138, § 24.

15-20.1-12.
Director of vocational rehabilitation division. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

Note.

For present provisions on vocational rehabilitation, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-06.1.

15-20.1-13.
Administration of vocational rehabilitation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-14.
Rehabilitation services provided to any disabled individual — Eligibility. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-15.
Rehabilitation services provided to disabled individuals requiring financial assistance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-16.
Gifts — Authorization to accept and use. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-16.1.
Gifts — Authorization to accept and use.

The director, with the approval of the state board, may accept and use gifts made unconditionally by will or otherwise for carrying out the purposes of this chapter. Gifts made under such conditions as in the judgment of the state board are proper and consistent with the provisions of this chapter may be so accepted and must be held, invested and reinvested, and used in accordance with the conditions of the gift.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 142, § 1.

15-20.1-16.2.
Science — Technology — Engineering — Mathematics — Grants — Continuing appropriation — Report.

The department of career and technical education may accept gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of providing science, technology, engineering, and mathematics advancement grants.

Grant recipients shall focus on facilitating, coordinating, and advancing science, technology, engineering, and mathematics initiatives in this state, and shall work with representatives of elementary and secondary education, tribal schools, higher education, and private sector industries to strengthen educational opportunities, align the educational opportunities with economic development and workforce needs, and ensure the existence of a creative and productive workforce with the skills and knowledge to be globally competitive.

All moneys received under this section are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department of career and technical education for the purpose of providing science, technology, engineering, and mathematics advancement grants. The department of career and technical education shall report to the appropriations committees of each legislative assembly on funds received and the use of the funds.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 139, § 1.

15-20.1-17.
Maintenance not assignable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-18.
Hearings allowed to aggrieved persons. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-19.
Misuse of vocational rehabilitation lists and records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-20.
Limitation of political activity. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 383, § 17.

15-20.1-21.
Biennial report.

The state board may submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04. If submitted, the report must set forth the condition of career and technical education in the state, a list of the schools to which federal and state aid for career and technical education has been given, and a detailed statement of the expenditures of federal and state funds for that purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 4; 1973, ch. 383, § 16; 1973, ch. 403, § 11; 1975, ch. 466, § 12; 1995, ch. 350, § 11; 2003, ch. 138, § 25.

15-20.1-22.
Grants for innovation.

The department shall provide grants to eligible recipients for the funding of:

Science projects or programs;

Technology projects or programs; and

Innovation programs for kindergarten, elementary, or high school students.

An eligible recipient for purposes of this section is a teacher, a school, a school district, or an institution of higher education.

A grant awarded under this section is competitive, may not exceed twenty thousand dollars if the recipient is an institution of higher education, and may not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars in the case of any other recipient.

In awarding a grant under this section, the department may require dollar-for-dollar matching funds. If the department requires matching funds, an eligible recipient may obtain those matching funds from any public or nonpublic source.

The department shall consult with the department of commerce in making award determinations under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 29; 2011, ch. 122, § 1.

15-20.1-23.
North Dakota elementary student entrepreneurship program.

There is created a North Dakota elementary student entrepreneurship program under the authority of the state board. The state board shall adopt policies to create a program of grants to support entrepreneurship education that is coordinated with classroom curriculum, standards, and activities encouraging and showcasing entrepreneurial activities at the elementary education level.

The grants must be awarded to school districts and require matching funds of up to fifty percent of the curriculum and activity costs.

At the request of a school district, the state board may forward the district’s grant directly to an entity providing services in accordance with this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 19, § 6; 2013, ch. 140, § 1.

15-20.1-24.
Career development facilitation — Certificate — Qualifications.

The department shall develop a program leading to a certificate in career development facilitation. The department shall award the certificate to any individual who:

Holds a baccalaureate degree from an accredited institution of higher education;

Has at least a five-year employment history; and

Successfully completes the department’s programmatic requirements.

An individual holding a certificate awarded under this section is a career advisor.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 1.

15-20.1-25.
Career development facilitation — Provisional approval.

The department may provisionally approve an individual to serve as a career advisor if the individual:

Holds a baccalaureate degree from an accredited institution of higher education;

Has at least a five-year employment history; and

Provides the department with a plan for completing the department’s programmatic requirements within a two-year period.

Provisional approval under subsection 1 is valid for a period of two years and may not be extended by the department.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 2.